Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-1382
Unresolved
issues; final offers; prehearing conference; commission;
authority.

(1) No later than January 10, the parties
in labor contract negotiations shall reduce to writing and sign all agreed-upon
issues and exchange final offers on each unresolved issue. Final offers may
not be amended or modified without the concurrence of the other party.

(2) No later than January 15, the parties in labor contract
negotiations shall submit all unresolved issues that resulted in impasse to
the commission. No party shall submit an issue
to the commission that was not subject to negotiations. The commission shall conduct a
prehearing conference and shall
have the authority to:

(a) Determine whether the issues are ready for adjudication;

(b) Accept stipulations;

(c) Schedule hearings;

(d) Prescribe rules of conduct for the hearings;

(e) Order additional mediation if necessary; and

(f) Take any other actions which may aid in the disposal
of the action.

The commission may
consult with the parties ex parte only with the concurrence of both parties.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 27.
October 1, 2011